Idaho statutes. Title 31 COUNTIES AND COUNTY LAW
Chapter 48 EMERGENCY COMMUNICATIONS ACT
§ 31-4815. Creation of the Idaho public safety communications commission — Terms.

There is hereby created in the military division an Idaho public safety communications commission (hereinafter referred to as “the commission”) with the purposes identified in section 31-4801(2)(d), Idaho Code.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the commission shall, upon being constituted, exercise its powers and duties in accordance with the provisions of this section relative to consolidated emergency communications and interoperable public safety communications and data systems in this state established by enactment of the legislature or by private act.

All members of the commission will be appointed by the governor and will serve at the pleasure of the governor.

The commission shall be composed of eighteen (18) voting members. The statewide interoperability coordinator of the Idaho bureau of homeland security [Idaho office of emergency management] will not be a member of the commission, but shall report quarterly to the commission.

Appointment by the governor will include the following voting members:

The director of the Idaho bureau of homeland security [Idaho office of emergency management] or a designated representative and the director of the Idaho state police or a designated representative.

The chair of the Idaho technology authority and one (1) legislator selected by joint approval from the speaker of the house of representatives and the president pro tempore of the senate.

The governor will receive suggested names of candidates and alternates for representation from the following and will appoint at his own discretion one (1) representative as a voting member from each: one (1) member representing the association of Idaho cities, one (1) member representing the Idaho association of counties, two (2) members representing the Idaho sheriffs’ association, one (1) member representing the Idaho chiefs of police association, one (1) member representing the Idaho fire chiefs association, one (1) member representing the Idaho health and welfare department’s state emergency medical services communications center, and one (1) member representing the Native American tribes of the state.

Six (6) district interoperable governance board (DIGB) representatives. Each district shall select from the following to represent its district: a county commissioner, sheriff, mayor, chief of police, fire service chief, public safety answering point manager, public safety technology manager or emergency medical services manager.

Commission representatives shall be appointed by the governor as follows:

Each association, entity or DIGB shall select one (1) primary and one (1) alternate candidate to represent the association, entity or DIGB. Following administrative procedures guidelines, both names shall be submitted to the administrative agency responsible for these tasks, which is the Idaho bureau of homeland security [Idaho office of emergency management], within thirty (30) days after a term expires or a vacancy occurs. The Idaho bureau of homeland security [Idaho office of emergency management] will then forward each entity’s names to the governor for consideration and appointment to the commission.
(b) Should any association, entity or DIGB fail to submit the names of the candidate and the alternate as directed in this subsection, the commission shall select a candidate and alternate from the association, entity or district and submit those names to the governor for consideration and appointment to the commission.

Except as provided in this subsection, members of the commission shall be appointed to a term of four (4) years. The following members shall be appointed to an initial term of two (2) years: the member representing the Idaho fire chiefs association, the member representing the Idaho chiefs of police association, one (1) member representing the Idaho sheriffs’ association, the member representing the Idaho department of health and welfare emergency medical services communications center, the member representing the Native American tribes, the member from the state legislature, the chair of the Idaho technology authority, and the representatives of DIGBs one, three and five. The remaining members appointed by the governor shall be appointed for an initial term of four (4) years. Thereafter, all terms shall be for a period of four (4) years.

The commission shall recommend to the governor a list of candidates to be appointed to a four-year term as chair. The governor shall appoint the chair from the list of candidates. The commission shall elect a vice-chair and such officers as it may deem necessary and appropriate. The commission shall meet at least annually and at the call of the chair. Members of the commission shall be compensated as provided in section 59-509(b), Idaho Code. Compensation shall be paid from the emergency communications fund created in section 31-4818, Idaho Code.

§ 31-4816. Idaho public safety communications commission — Responsibilities.

The responsibilities of the commission are to:

Determine the status and operability of consolidated emergency communications systems and interoperable public safety communications and data systems statewide;

Determine the needs for the upgrade of consolidated emergency communications systems and interoperable public safety communications and data systems;

Determine the costs for the upgrades;

Recommend guidelines and standards for operation of consolidated emergency communications systems and interoperable public safety communications and data systems;

Recommend funding mechanisms for future implementation of upgrades;

Serve as a conduit for the future allocation of federal grant funds to support the delivery of consolidated emergency communications systems and interoperable public safety communications and data systems;

Serve as the statewide interoperability executive committee (SIEC) for issues related to public safety communications and data communication. Such issues may involve the federal communications commission, national telecommunications [and] information administration and first responder network authority;

Perform an annual review of the statewide communications interoperability plan and provide the statewide interoperability coordinator with guidance to improve operational and interoperable communications in the state;

Designate working groups or subcommittees as appropriate, which may include consolidated emergency communications, information technology, cross-jurisdictional relations with Native American tribes, interoperable public safety communications and data systems, the national public safety broadband network or future technologies, and others as deemed necessary by the commission;

Report annually to the legislature of the state of Idaho on the planned expenditures for the next fiscal year, the collected revenues and moneys disbursed from the fund and programs or projects in progress, completed or anticipated;

Enter into contracts with experts, agents, employees or consultants as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

Assist public safety communications stakeholders in the establishment of consolidated emergency communications systems and public safety communications and data systems, and to provide the governance structure through which public safety communications stakeholders can collaborate to advance consistency and common objectives;

Provide integrated facilitation and coordination for cross-jurisdictional consensus building;

Assist in the standardization of agreements for sharing resources among jurisdictions with emergency response communications infrastructure;

Suggest best practices, performance measures and performance evaluation in the integrated statewide strategic planning and implementation of interoperability;

Manage funds as authorized by this chapter;

Pursue budget authorizations for interoperable public safety communications and data systems; and
(18) Promulgate rules pursuant to the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, to carry out the purposes of the commission’s duties.

§ 31-4817. Idaho public safety communications commission — Mediation.

In the event that a dispute arises between local government entities over the governance of operations of consolidated emergency communications systems and interoperable public safety communications and data systems, those local governments shall be required, prior to initiating any legal action, to submit the contested issue or issues to the commission for purposes of mediation. The commission shall have sixty (60) days from the date of submission of any issues to mediate and recommend a course of action to the local governments involved in the dispute. Any recommendation of the commission shall be advisory only and shall not be binding on the parties involved. After receipt of any recommendation by the commission, the local governments may accept in whole or in part the recommendations or may initiate legal action as provided by contract or law.

§ 31-4818. Idaho emergency communications fund — Establishment and administration.

There is hereby created within the treasury of the state of Idaho a separate fund known as the Idaho emergency communications fund, which shall consist of moneys received from counties, cities, consolidated emergency communications operations, the fee imposed pursuant to the provisions of section 31-4813, Idaho Code, grants, donations, gifts and revenues from any other source to support the delivery of consolidated emergency communications systems.

Moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated and shall be utilized exclusively for the purposes set forth in this chapter as determined by the commission.

Annually, at the direction of the commission, not more than one percent (1%) of the total emergency communications fees collected in the state of Idaho is hereby dedicated for and shall be placed in the fund on a quarterly basis by county, city or consolidated emergency communications systems. The commission, on an annual basis, shall prepare a budget indicating that portion of the fee necessary for the continuous operation of the commission to achieve the purposes of this chapter.

The commission shall authorize disbursement of moneys in the fund to eligible entities.

The state treasurer shall invest idle moneys in the fund and interest earned from such investments shall be returned to the fund.

Funds received from the fee imposed pursuant to the provisions of section 31-4813, Idaho Code, shall be distributed quarterly to each governing board based upon population served, excluding one percent (1%) to be used for administration of the emergency communications commission as described in this section.

This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety or support of the state government and its existing public institutions and takes effect January 1, 2014.

§ 31-4819. Enhanced emergency communications grant fee.

On and after July 1, 2013, there shall be an enhanced emergency communications grant fee established by virtue of authority granted by this chapter. The fee shall be twenty-five cents (25¢) per month per access or interconnected VoIP service line.

Such fee shall be authorized by resolution of a majority vote of the board of commissioners of a countywide system or by the governing board of a 911 service area.

Such fee shall be remitted to the Idaho emergency communications fund provided in section 31-4818(1), Idaho Code, on a quarterly basis by county, city or consolidated emergency communications systems. Annually, at the discretion of the commission, a budget shall be prepared allocating a portion of the available grant funds for administration of the grant program. The remaining grant funds shall be dedicated for and shall be authorized for disbursement as grants to eligible entities that are operating consolidated emergency communications systems for use to achieve the purposes of this chapter. Grant funds shall coincide with the strategic goals as identified by the commission in its annual report to the legislature. Grant funds may also be budgeted for and utilized for the establishment of next generation consolidated emergency systems (NG911) within the state.

The commission, on an annual basis, shall prepare a budget allocating the grant funds available to eligible entities and the portion of the funds necessary for the continuous operation of the commission to achieve the purposes of this chapter.

To be eligible for grant funds under this chapter, a county or 911 service area must be collecting the emergency communications fee in accordance with section 31-4804, Idaho Code, in the full amount authorized and must also be collecting the enhanced emergency communications grant fee in the full amount authorized in this subsection [subsection (1)].

If a county or 911 service area has authorized the collection of the enhanced emergency communications grant fee pursuant to this chapter, such county or 911 service area shall retain the full amount of the emergency communications fee that was set by the board of commissioners or governing board pursuant to section 31-4803, Idaho Code. The county or 911 service area is then also exempt from remitting to the Idaho public safety communications commission one percent (1%) of the total emergency communications fee received by the county or 911 service area as required in section 31-4818(3), Idaho Code. The remaining funds from the enhanced emergency communications grant fee collected shall then be remitted by the county or 911 service area to the Idaho public safety communications commission.

§ 31-4820. Idaho public safety interoperable communications and data systems fund — Establishment and administration.

There is hereby created within the treasury of the state of Idaho a separate fund known as the Idaho public safety interoperable communications and data systems fund. This fund may consist of moneys received from the state, counties, cities, grants, donations, gifts and other revenues.

Moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated and shall be utilized exclusively for the purposes set forth in this chapter.

Annually, at the direction of the commission, a budget shall be prepared allocating a portion of the available funds for administration of the public safety interoperable communications and data systems programs, for the purposes of this section.

§ 31-4821. Administrative support.

The commission may, with consensus of the governor and legislature of the state of Idaho, create positions including, but not limited to, executive director, 911 program manager, 911 grants manager, statewide interoperability coordinator, national public safety broadband network program manager, or other administrative support positions as required to carry out the provisions of this chapter. In accordance with the law of the state of Idaho, and striving to keep administrative costs to a minimum, the commission may hire, fix the compensation and prescribe the powers and duties of such individuals.